Louisiana, session 2026, HB985.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 32:412(I) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§412. Amount of fees; credit or refund; duration of license; veteran designation;
special needs or accommodation designations; disbursement of funds;
renewal by mail or electronic commerce of Class "D" or "E" drivers' licenses;
disposition of certain fees; exception
* * *
I.(1) The A Louisiana driver's license, regardless of its class, that is issued
to any person who is required to register as a sex offender pursuant to R.S. 15:542
and R.S. 15:542.1 Chapter 3-B of Title 15 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950
shall contain a restriction quick response code which declares that or a QR code on
the back of the driver's license for the purposes of assisting law enforcement in
determining whether or not the license holder is a sex offender. The secretary of the
Department of Public Safety and Corrections shall comply with the provisions of this
Subsection and the driver's license shall include the words "sex offender" which shall
be orange in color.
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1818 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 985
(2) Any person to whom this Subsection applies shall carry upon his person
the last driver's license issued to him. A person who is issued a driver's license
pursuant to this Subsection shall carry his driver's license on his person at all times
when he is outside of his residence.
(3) The department shall issue a license required pursuant to this Subsection
for a period of one year. When the department issues a license pursuant to this
Subsection and the license shall be valid for a period of one year from the date of
issuance.
(4) Any person to whom who is subject to this Subsection applies shall
personally appear at a motor vehicle field office to renew his driver's license every
year, in addition to the yearly reregistration that is required pursuant to R.S. 15:542
et seq Chapter 3-B of Title 15 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950.
Reregistration shall include the submission of current information to the department
and the verification of registration information, including the street address and
telephone number of the registrant; name, street address, and telephone number of
the registrant's employer, and any other registration information that may need to be
verified. Upon successful completion of reregistration, the bureau shall
electronically transmit this fact the completed reregistration to the office of motor
vehicles which may then proceed to renew the driver's license. In order to reimburse
the office of motor vehicles for the cost of a yearly issuance, the regular renewal fee
shall be collected at each renewal pursuant to this Subsection.
(5) Whoever intentionally fails to meet the requirements of this Subsection
shall be fined not less than one hundred dollars nor more than five hundred dollars
or imprisoned for not more than six months, or both.
(5) (6) The provisions of this This Subsection shall apply applies to all
registered sex offenders regardless of the date of conviction. A registered sex
offender who has been issued a driver's license pursuant to this Subsection shall
forfeit his driver's license to the office of motor vehicles if he subsequently obtains
a special identification card pursuant to R.S. 40:1321(J).
* * *
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1818 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 985
Section 2. R.S. 40:1321(J) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§1321. State identification cards; special identification cards; issuance; veteran
designation; special needs or accommodation designations; fees; expiration
and renewal; exceptions; promulgation of rules; promotion of use; persons
less than twenty-one years of age; the Protect and Save our Children
Program; Selective Service Registration
* * *
J.(1) Any person required to register as a sex offender with the Louisiana
Bureau of Criminal Identification and Information, as required by R.S. 15:542 et
seq., pursuant to Chapter 3-B of Title 15 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950
shall obtain a special identification card issued by the Department of Public Safety
and Corrections which shall contain a restriction quick response code declaring that,
or QR Code, on the back of the special identification card for the purposes of
assisting law enforcement in determining whether or not the holder is a sex offender.
This special identification card shall include the words "sex offender" in all capital
letters which are orange in color and shall be is valid for a period of one year from
the date of issuance. This special identification card shall be carried on the person
and the holder shall carry the special identification card on his person at all times by
the individual required to register as a sex offender when he is outside of his
residence.
(2) Each person required to carry a special identification card pursuant to this
Subsection shall personally appear, annually, on an annual basis at a field office of
the office of motor vehicles to renew his or her special identification card but only
after he or she has registered as an a sex offender pursuant to R.S. 15:542 et seq.
Chapter 3-B of Title 15 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950. Reregistration
shall include includes the submission of current information to the department and
the verification of this information, which shall include includes the street address
and telephone number of the registrant; the name, street address, and telephone
number of the registrant's employer, and any registration information that may need
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1818 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 985
to be verified by the bureau. No special identification card shall be issued or
renewed until the office of motor vehicles receives confirmation from the bureau The
office of motor vehicles shall not issue or renew a special identification card until the
bureau has confirmed to the office, electronically or by other means, that the
reregistration of the sex offender has been completed.
(3) The provisions of this This Subsection shall apply applies to all sex
offenders who are required to register pursuant to R.S. 15:542 et seq. Chapter 3-B
of Title 15 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950, regardless of the date of
conviction.
(4) Whoever violates intentionally fails to meet the requirements of this
Subsection shall be fined not less than one hundred dollars and not nor more than
five hundred dollars, or imprisoned for not more than six months, or both.
(5) A registered sex offender who has been issued a special identification
card pursuant to this Subsection shall forfeit his special identification card to the
office of motor vehicles if he subsequently obtains a driver's license pursuant to R.S.
32:412(I).
* * *
Section 3. This Act shall become effective on January 1, 2027.